Maryland, session 2026, HB1381.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–101.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1381*

HOUSE BILL 1381
(a) In this title and Title 25 of this article the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(c) “Bicycle path” means any travelway designed and designated by signing or
signing and marking for bicycle use, located within its own right–of–way or in a shared
right–of–way, and physically separated from motor vehicle traffic by berm, shoulder, curb,
or other similar device.
(e) “Bike lane” means any portion of a roadway or shoulder designated for single
directional bicycle flow.
21–1003.
(a) The provisions of this section apply except as necessary to avoid conflict with
other traffic or in compliance with law or the directions of a police officer or traffic control
device.
(GG) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(I) AN AUTHORIZED EMERGENCY VEHICLE;
(II) A TRANSIT VEHICLE;
(III) A VEHICLE PICKING UP OR DISCHARGING INDIVIDUALS
WITH DISABILITIES;
(IV) A VEHICLE THAT HAS BECOME SO DISABLED WHILE ON THE
HIGHWAY THAT THE DRIVER CANNOT AVOID STOPPING AND TEMPORARILY
STANDING OR PARKING THE VEHICLE; OR
(V) A IF NO OTHER PARKING SPACE, SHOULDER, OR OTHER
CURB SPACE IS AVAILABLE ON THE BLOCK, A VEHICLE WHILE LOADING OR
UNLOADING GOODS FOR PICK UP OR DELIVERY:
1. A. UNLESS A SHORTER PERIOD OF TIME IS
IMPOSED UNDER A IF AUTHORIZED UNDER LOCAL LAW, FOR A PERIOD OF TIME NOT
EXCEEDING 30 MINUTES; AND
B. THAT IS DISPLAYING FLASHING HAZARD WARNING
LIGHTS; OR
2. UNDER A LOCAL CURBSIDE PARKING PERMIT; OR

HOUSE BILL 1381 3
(VI) A VEHICLE ASSOCIATED WITH CONSTRUCTION OR
MAINTENANCE ACTIVITIES IN OR ADJACENT TO THE RIGHT–OF–WAY.
(2) UNLESS AUTHORIZED BY A LOCAL JURISDICTION, A PERSON MAY
NOT STOP, STAND, OR PARK A VEHICLE IN A BIKE LANE OR BICYCLE PATH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.